fi: Kohdelihasryhmä: Käsivarret; Selkä; Hauikset; Rinta; Keskivartalo; Pakarat; Takareidet; Etureidet; Hartiat; Ojentajat; Muu
en: Targeted muscle group: Arms; Back; Biceps; Chest; Core; Glutes; Hamstrings; Quadriceps; Shoulders; Triceps; Other
lt-LT: Tikslinė raumenų grupė: Rankos; Nugara; Bicepsai; Krūtinė; Liemuo; Sėdmenys; Užpakaliniai šlaunų raumenys; Keturgalviai šlaunų raumenys; Pečiai; Tricepsai; Kita
sv: Riktad muskelgrupp: Armar; Rygg; Biceps; Bröst; Bål; Sätesmuskler; Baksida lår; Framsida lår; Axlar; Triceps; Annat
nl: Doel spiergroep: Armen; Rug; Biceps; Borst; Core; Bilspieren; Hamstrings; Quadriceps; Schouders; Triceps; Overig
zh-CN: 目标肌肉群: 手臂; 背部; 肱二头肌; 胸部; 核心肌肉; 臀部肌肉; 腘绳肌; 股四头肌; 肩部; 肱三头肌; 其他
zh-TW: 目標肌肉群: 手臂; 背部; 二頭肌; 胸部; 核心; 臀部; 腿後肌群; 股四頭肌; 肩部; 三頭肌; 其他
da: Målrettet muskelgruppe: Arme; Ryg; Biceps; Bryst; Core; Balder; Baglår; Forlår; Skuldre; Triceps; Andet
hr-HR: Ciljana grupa mišića: Ruke; Leđa; Biceps; Prsa; Trup; Gluteusi; Stražnja loža; Kvadricepsi; Ramena; Triceps; Ostalo
pl: Docelowa grupa mięśni: Ramiona; Plecy; Biceps; Klatka piersiowa; Mięśnie głębokie (core); Pośladki; Mięśnie kulszowo-goleniowe; Mięśnie czworogłowe; Barki; Triceps; Inne
pt-BR: Grupo muscular-alvo: Braços; Costas; Bíceps; Peito; Core; Glúteos; Isquiotibiais; Quadríceps; Ombros; Tríceps; Outro
th: กลุ่มกล้ามเนื้อเป้าหมาย: แขน; หลัง; ไบเซ็ปส์; หน้าอก; แกนกลางลำตัว; กล้ามเนื้อสะโพก; แฮมสตริง; ควอดริเซ็ปส์; ไหล่; ไตรเซ็ปส์; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Целева мускулна група: Ръце; Гръб; Бицепс; Гърди; Кор; Седалищни мускули; Задни бедра; Квадрицепс; Рамене; Трицепс; Друго
ru: Целевая группа мышц: Руки; Спина; Бицепсы; Грудь; Мышцы кора; Ягодицы; Задняя поверхность бедра; Квадрицепсы; Плечи; Трицепсы; Другое
vi: Nhóm cơ mục tiêu: Cánh tay; Lưng; Bắp tay trước; Ngực; Cơ cốt lõi; Cơ mông; Gân kheo; Cơ đùi trước; Vai; Cơ tay sau; Khác
sl-SI: Ciljna mišična skupina: Roke; Hrbet; Biceps; Prsni koš; Trup; Zadnjica; Zadnja loža; Kvadriceps; Ramena; Triceps; Drugo
ro-RO: Grupă de mușchi vizată: Brațe; Spate; Bicepși; Piept; Trunchi; Fesieri; Ischiogambieri; Cvadricepși; Umeri; Tricepși; Altele
nb: Målrettet muskelgruppe: Armer; Rygg; Biceps; Bryst; Kjernemuskulatur; Setemuskulatur; Bakside lår; Forside lår; Skuldre; Triceps; Annet
ja: 対象筋肉グループ: 腕; 背中; 上腕二頭筋; 胸; 体幹; 臀部; ハムストリング; 大腿四頭筋; 肩; 上腕三頭筋; その他
tr: Hedeflenen kas grubu: Kollar; Sırt; Biceps; Göğüs; Core bölgesi; Kalça; Arka bacak; Ön bacak; Omuzlar; Triceps; Diğer
fr: Groupe musculaire ciblé: Bras; Dos; Biceps; Pectoraux; Tronc; Fessiers; Ischio-jambiers; Quadriceps; Épaules; Triceps; Autre
hu: Célzott izomcsoport: Karok; Hát; Bicepsz; Mell; Törzsizomzat; Farizmok; Combhajlítók; Combfeszítők; Váll; Tricepsz; Egyéb
cs: Cílová svalová skupina: Paže; Záda; Bicepsy; Hrudník; Střed těla (core); Hýždě; Hamstringy; Kvadricepsy; Ramena; Tricepsy; Jiné
de: Zielmuskelgruppe: Arme; Rücken; Bizeps; Brust; Rumpf; Gesäß; Oberschenkelrückseite; Quadrizeps; Schultern; Trizeps; Sonstige
pt-PT: Grupo muscular específico: Braços; Costas; Bíceps; Peito; Core; Glúteos; Isquiotibiais; Quadríceps; Ombros; Tríceps; Outro
es: Grupo muscular específico: Brazos; Espalda; Bíceps; Pecho; Core; Glúteos; Isquiotibiales; Cuádriceps; Hombros; Tríceps; Otro
it: Gruppo muscolare interessato: Braccia; Schiena; Bicipiti; Petto; Core; Glutei; Muscoli posteriori della coscia; Quadricipiti; Spalle; Tricipiti; Altro
el: Στοχευμένη μυϊκή ομάδα: Χέρια; Πλάτη; Δικέφαλοι; Στήθος; Κορμός; Γλουτοί; Οπίσθιοι μηριαίοι; Τετρακέφαλοι; Ώμοι; Τρικέφαλοι; Άλλο
ko: 목표 근육군: 팔; 등; 이두근; 가슴; 코어; 둔근; 햄스트링; 대퇴사두근; 어깨; 삼두근; 기타
sk-SK: Cieľová svalová skupina: Paže; Chrbát; Biceps; Hrudník; Stred tela; Sedacie svaly; Zadné stehenné svaly (hamstringy); Predné stehenné svaly (kvadricepsy); Ramená; Triceps; Iné